Maine, session 132, LD1704.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6501, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Gender identity and sanitary facilities. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary within Title 5, chapter 337, a school administrative unit may not adopt a policy
that permits a student to use a sanitary facility according to the student's gender identity if
that sanitary facility is designated for use by a sex that does not correspond to the student's
sex assigned at birth.
Sec. 2. Department of education to update rules. The Department of Education
shall update its rules as necessary to conform with the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A,
section 6501, subsection 6.